src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
prassimine+N:pr˘asʲsimine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
pravdalane+N:pravdalane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preambul+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pre˘ambul REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
preambula+N:preˈambula AASTA  "weight: 9 " ; 
prebiootikum+N:pre%#biootikum TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@predikaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈedik˘aat TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@predikatiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈedikat˘iiv TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prednisoloon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prednisol˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
preeklampsia+N:pre%#ekl˘ampsia AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
preemia+N:pr˘eemia AASTA  "weight: 7 " ; 
preeria+N:pr˘eeria AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
preeriahunt+N:pr˘eeria%#h˘unʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prees+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘eesʲ TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preesens+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preesens REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preester+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘eester%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 7 " ; 
preesterkond+N:pr˘eesterk˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
preestrinna+N:pr˘eestrinna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preestritar+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preestritar TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preetor+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘eetor REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prefekt+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pref˘ekt TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prefektuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prefekt˘uur TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preferanss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈefer˘anss TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prefiks+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prefiks REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
preili+N:preili PERE  "weight: 8 " ; 
preilna+N:preilna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preiskurant+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈeiskur˘anʲt TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
preislane+N:pr˘eislane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
preislanna+N:preislanna PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prelaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prel˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
preluudium+N:prel˘uudium MUUSEUM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prelüüd+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prel˘üüd TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preparaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈepar˘aat TAUD  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preparaator+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prepar˘aator REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prepositsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prepositsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preprint+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prepr˘int TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
prerafaeliit+N:pre%#rafael˘iit TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@presbüter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presbüter TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
presbüterlane+N:presbüterlane OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@present+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pres˘enʲt TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@presentatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presentatsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
presentjope+N:pres˘enʲt%#jope PERE  "weight: 11 " ; 
presentpüksid+N:pres˘enʲt%#p˘üks POISS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preserv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pres˘erv TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preservatiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preservat˘iiv TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
presidendikandidaat+N:prˈesidenʲdi%#kˈanʲdid˘aat TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
presidendipalee+N:prˈesidenʲdi%#pal˘ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE  "weight: 11 " ; 
presidenditool+N:prˈesidenʲdi%#t˘oolʲ TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
presidendivalimised+N:prˈesidenʲdi%#valimine OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
presidendivoor+N:prˈesidenʲdi%#v˘oor%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@president+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈesid˘enʲt TAUD  "weight: 5 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@presidentuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@president˘uur TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
presiidium+N:pres˘iidium MUUSEUM  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prespan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘espan REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@press+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘esʲs TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
pressibüroo+N:presʲsi%#bür˘oo ARMEE  "weight: 10 " ; 
pressiesindaja+N:presʲsi%#esindaja AASTA  "weight: 7 " ; 
pressikas+N:presʲsika LOHAKAS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pressiklubi+N:presʲsi%#klubi%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
pressikonverents+N:presʲsi%#kˈonver˘ents TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
pressimine+N:pr˘esʲsimine OLULINE  "weight: 9 " ; 
pressinõunik+N:presʲsi%#n˘õun˘ik ÄMBLIK  "weight: 10 " ; 
pressiosakond+N:presʲsi%#ˈosak˘onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV  "weight: 11 " ; 
pressisekretär+N:presʲsi%#sekretär TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
pressisõber+N:presʲsi%#s˘õP2E2r%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pressitalitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presʲsi%#talitus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pressiteenistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presʲsi%#teenistus OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
pressivaenlane+N:presʲsi%#v˘aenlane SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
pressraud+N:pr˘esʲs%#r˘auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prestiiž+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prest˘iiž TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@presumptsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@presumptsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preteeritum+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preteeritum TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretendent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈetend˘enʲt TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretensioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretensi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretensioonikus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretensioonikus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretoriaan+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretori˘aan TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsedenditus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretsedenditus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsedent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈetsed˘enʲt TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsessioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretsessi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pretsisioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pretsisi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
prevaleerimine+N:preval˘eerimine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@preventsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@preventsi˘oon TAUD  "weight: 9 " ; 
prigin+N:prigin MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
priikslaskmine+N:pr˘iiks%#l˘askmine SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
priileivasööja+N:pr˘ii%#leiva%#s˘ööja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@priim+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘iim TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
priimas+N:priimas SOOLANE  "weight: 11 " ; 
priimula+N:priimula AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@priimus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@priimus SOOLANE  "weight: 10 " ; 
priinimi+N:pr˘ii%#nim NIMI  "weight: 11 " ; 
priipõlv+N:pr˘ii%#p˘õlʲ PÕLV  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@priis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘iis TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
priiskaja+N:pr˘iiskaja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
priiskamine+N:pr˘iiskamine OLULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@priius+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘iius SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
priiusetooja+N:pr˘iiuse%#t˘ooja AASTA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prikaas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prik˘aas TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prikk+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘ikk TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
prill-laud+N:pr˘ilʲl-l˘auD1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM  "weight: 11 " ; 
prillauk+N:pr˘ilʲl%#˘auk%>%{pl.e%} KOON  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prillid+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘ilʲl TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
prilliklaas+N:prilʲli%#kl˘aasʲ TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
prillmadu+N:pr˘ilʲl%#maD1u KAVA  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@primaat+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prim˘aat TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
primadonna+N:primadˈonna PERE  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@primitiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈimit˘iiv TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@primitiivsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈimit˘iivsus SUULINE  "weight: 10 " ; 
primitivism+N:primitiv˘ism TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pringel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘ingel%{E%} REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prinkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘inkus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@print+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘int TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@printer+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘inter REDEL  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prints+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘ints TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@printsess+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈints˘esʲs TAUD  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@printsiibitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@printsiibitus OLULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@printsiip+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prints˘iip TAUD  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@printsipaal+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈintsip˘aal TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@printsipiaalsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@printsipi˘aalsus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prior+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prior REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prioress+N:@P.Stem.Nom@prˈior˘ess TAUD  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prioriteet+N:@P.Stem.Nom@priorit˘eet TAUD  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@priskus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘iskus SUULINE  "weight: 11 " ; 
prisma+N:prisma PERE  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pristav+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘istav REDEL  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@prits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘itʲs TAUD  "weight: 10 " ; 
pritse+N:pr˘itsE2 HAARE  "weight: 11 " ; 
pritse+N:pr˘itse PINGE  "weight: 11 " ; 
